Hawaii statutes.
§449-1.9 Powers of commissioner. In
addition to any other powers provided by law, the commissioner may:

(1) Administer and enforce the provisions and
requirements of this chapter;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules or declaratory
rulings pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(3) Issue informal nonbinding interpretations to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(4) Investigate and conduct hearings regarding any
violation of this chapter or any rule or order of the commissioner;

(5) Contract with or employ qualified persons,
including investigators, examiners, or auditors who shall be exempt from
chapter 76 and who shall assist the commissioner in exercising the
commissioner's powers and duties;

(6) Deposit all fees, fines, and charges collected by
the commissioner under this chapter into the compliance resolution fund
established pursuant to section 26‑9(o);

(7) Process and investigate complaints, subpoena
witnesses and documents, administer oaths, and receive affidavits and oral
testimony, including through electronic means, and conduct contested case
proceedings;

(8) Report any violation of this chapter or violation
of federal or state law to the United States Commissioner of Housing and Urban
Development or any other federal agency having jurisdiction over the licensee;
and

(9) Enter into agreements or contracts with the
operators of NMLS or other entities designated by NMLS to collect and maintain
records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or
other persons subject to this chapter; provided that:

(A) For the purpose and the extent necessary
to use NMLS, the commissioner may:

(i) Require all escrow depositories to
register with NMLS; and

(ii) Waive or modify, in whole or in part, by
rule or order, any or all of the requirements of this chapter and establish new
requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in NMLS; and

(B) In addition to other uses of NMLS, the
commissioner may use NMLS as an agent for:

(i) Requesting information from and
distributing information to the United States Department of Justice or any
other governmental agency; and

(ii) Requesting and distributing information to
and from any source directed by the commissioner. [L 2013, c 166, §1; am L
2016, c 224, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next